Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.265

Career and technical education funding allocations.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5358-S2.SL) ***

(1) To the extent that career and technical education funding allocations under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(c) and (9) exceed general education funding allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, school districts may use the difference only for the career and technical education purposes, defined as follows:

(a) Staff salaries and benefits for career and technical education program delivery;

(b) Materials, supplies, and operating costs;

(c) Smaller class sizes;

(d) Work-based learning programs such as internships and preapprenticeship programs, including coordination tied to career and technical education coursework;

(e) New high quality career and technical education and expanded learning program development in high-demand fields;

(f) Certificated work-based learning coordinators and career guidance advisors;

(g) School expenses associated with career and technical education community partnerships with a career discovery focus including research or evidence-based mentoring programs and expanded learning opportunities in school, before or after school, and during the summer, and career-focused education programs with private and public K-12 schools and colleges, community-based organizations and nonprofit organizations, industry partners, tribal governments, and workforce development entities;

(h) Student fees for national and state industry-recognized certifications; and

(i) Course equivalency development to integrate core learning standards into career and technical education courses.

(2) A school district's maximum allowable indirect cost charges for approved career and technical education programs funded by the state may not exceed the lower of five percent or the cap established in federal law for federal career and technical education funding provided to school districts, as the federal law existed on September 1, 2017.

[2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 409.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.